New York, session 2025-2026, S7184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (i) of subparagraph (c) of paragraph 9 of subdivi- 2 sion c of section 26-511 of the administrative code of the city of New 3 York, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) the tenant's initial tenancy commenced after the owner acquired 5 the property and the owner requires the unit in connection with its 6 charitable or educational purposes including, but not limited to, hous- 7 ing for affiliated persons; provided that with respect to any unit occu- 8 pied by a tenant whose right to occupancy commenced prior to July first, 9 nineteen hundred seventy-eight pursuant to a written lease or written 10 rental agreement and who did not receive notice at the time of the 11 execution of the lease that [his or her] their tenancy was subject to 12 non-renewal, the institution shall not have the right to refuse to renew 13 such tenant or their successors, or any tenant thereafter, pursuant to 14 this subparagraph unless such refusal or non-renewal is based on other 15 grounds specified in state law; provided further that a tenant who was 16 affiliated with the institution at the commencement of [his or her] 17 their tenancy and whose affiliation terminates during such tenancy shall 18 not have the right to a renewal lease; or 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 20 ments to section 26-511 of chapter 4 of title 26 of the administrative 21 code of the city of New York made by section one of this act shall 22 expire on the same date as such law expires and shall not affect the 23 expiration of such law as provided under section 26-520 of such law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11521-01-5